Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1404
Cooperative fuel tax agreements; local reciprocal exemption agreements; authorized.

The director may enter into a cooperative fuel tax agreement with another state or states which provides for the administration, collection, and enforcement by the base state of each state's motor fuel taxes on motor fuel used by interstate motor carriers. The agreement shall not contain any provision which exempts any motor vehicle, owner, or operator from complying with the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to vehicle licensing, size, weight, or load or the operation of motor vehicles upon the highways of this state. The director may also enter into agreements that provide for local reciprocal exemptions from motor fuel tax apportionment for a motor carrier operating within a limited local delivery area near the borders of the state. The agreements for local reciprocal exemptions may only extend to deliveries not more than fifteen miles into another state and shall require a ninety-day notice to rescind the agreement.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 25;

Laws 1999, LB 77, § 1.